District of Columbia statutes.
7-2871.02

Concussion protection.

(a)

An athlete who is suspected of sustaining a concussion in an athletic activity shall be immediately removed from physical participation in the athletic activity.

(b)

An athlete who has been removed from an athletic activity may not return to physical participation in the athletic activity until he or she has been evaluated by a licensed or certified health-care provider and receives written clearance to return to physical participation in the athletic activity from the evaluating health-care provider.

Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-22, § 3, 58 DCR 6506